New Jersey, session 222, S4184.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the New Jersey State Board of Dentistry shall adopt rules and regulations that include orofacial pain as a special area of dentistry that may be announced as a specialty dental practice by a licensed dentist pursuant to N.J.A.C.13:30-6.1 or its successor regulation. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.